Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning Contractors

198B.650.
Definitions for KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689.

As used in KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Air conditioning or cooling system” means a system in which heat is removed from air, surrounding surfaces, or both;

“Apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic” means an individual in the process of learning the heating, ventilation, and air conditioning trade who assists and is under the supervision of a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor and a journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic;

“Burner service” means the servicing of oil or gas burners used for heating air or water for purposes other than the transmission of heat;

“Certificate” means a document issued by the department to an apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic to assist a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor or a journeyman heating, ventilation, or air conditioning mechanic;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Heating system” means a system in which heat is transmitted by radiation, conduction, convection, or a combination of any of these methods to air, surrounding surfaces, or both. “Heating system” does not include fireplaces and free-standing stoves not incorporated into a primary heating system, electric thermal storage units, electric ceiling cable heating systems, or electric baseboard heating units;

“Hydronic system” means a heating and cooling system using liquids to transmit or remove heat;

“Initial heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system” means the first or original heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system installed in a building;

“Journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic” means an individual who is licensed by the department to perform heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work under the supervision, direction, and responsibility of a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor;

“Maintenance person or maintenance engineer” means a person who is a regular and bona fide employee of a property owner, property lessor, property management company, or firm, not in the heating, ventilating, and air conditioning business that has jurisdiction of property where the routine maintenance of heating, ventilating, and air conditioning is being performed, provided the maintenance shall not include major repairs;

“Major repair” means the complete replacement of any of the following heating, ventilation, or air conditioning equipment:

Furnaces;

Condensing units;

Heat pumps;

Fan coil units;

Chiller systems; or

Heating boiler systems not covered by KRS Chapter 236;

“Master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor” means a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor who is licensed by the department to advertise and practice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting in this Commonwealth;

“Permit” means a document issued by the department or its authorized agent allowing the installation of an original heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system;

“Practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting” means the installation, maintenance, altering, remodeling, or repair of heating systems, ventilation systems, hydronic systems, burner service, or cooling systems;

“Routine maintenance of heating, ventilation, or air conditioning” means the routine and periodic servicing of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems, including cleaning, inspection, and adjustments to ensure the proper operation, and the removal and replacement of component parts. “Routine maintenance of heating, ventilation, or air conditioning” shall not include major repairs; and

“Ventilation system” means a natural or mechanical system of supplying air to or removing air from any space.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 86, § 9, effective July 1, 2008; 2010, ch. 24 §§
286, 287, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 44, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

198B.652.
Kentucky Board of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning Contractors. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 24, § 288, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.654.
Powers and duties of department — Authority for administrative regulations.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:

Administer, coordinate, and enforce KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689;

Conduct examinations;

Maintain a list of all licensees and certificate holders;

Keep minutes of meetings and a record of its proceedings; and

Register and keep records of all apprentices.

The department, or its designee, may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, examine witnesses, conduct disciplinary proceedings, investigate allegations of wrongdoing under KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, issue licenses and certificates, and seek injunctive relief to enforce KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689. In seeking injunctive relief, the department shall not be required to post any bond.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 45, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.656.
Practice as and assumption and use of title master contractor, journeyman, or apprentice without a license prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689:

A person shall not claim to be or advertise as being a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor or assume or use any title, designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression of this licensure, unless that person is the holder of a valid master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license issued in accordance with KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689. The holder of a valid master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license shall be entitled to practice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting, including the obtaining of any necessary permits in connection with the practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting, and shall be primarily responsible for the heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work performed;

A person shall not claim to be or advertise as being a journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic or assume or use any title, designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression of this licensure, unless that person is the holder of a valid journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic’s license issued in accordance with KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689;

A person shall not claim to be or advertise as being an apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic or assume or use any title, designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression of certification, unless that person is the holder of a valid apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic’s certificate issued in accordance with KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689; and

A person shall not practice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting, unless that person has met the requirements of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 46, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.658.
Qualifications for licensure and certification.

An applicant for a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States or be a resident alien who is authorized to do work in the United States;

Have been regularly and principally employed or engaged in heating, ventilation, and air conditioning trades as a journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic for not less than two (2) years under the direction and supervision of a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor;
(c) 1.

Have been regularly and principally employed or engaged in heating, ventilation, and air conditioning trades as a journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic for not less than two (2) years under the direction and supervision of a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor;

Have been regularly and principally employed or engaged in the practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting as a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor, or equivalent thereof, for not less than two (2) years in Kentucky or in a jurisdiction other than Kentucky, as demonstrated by verifiable documentation; or

Have been regularly and principally licensed and employed as a mechanical engineer in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or a jurisdiction other than Kentucky, for not less than two (2) years, as demonstrated by verifiable documentation;

Have passed an examination prescribed by the department to determine the applicant’s competency to practice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting; and

Have paid a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

An applicant for a journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic’s license shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States or be a resident alien who is authorized to do work in the United States;

Have been regularly and principally employed or engaged in heating, ventilation, and air conditioning trades for not less than two (2) years under the direction and supervision of a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor; or
(c) 1.

Have been regularly and principally employed or engaged in heating, ventilation, and air conditioning trades for not less than two (2) years under the direction and supervision of a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor; or

Have been regularly and principally employed or engaged in the performance of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work for not less than two (2) years in Kentucky or in a jurisdiction other than Kentucky, as demonstrated by verifiable documentation;

Have passed an examination prescribed by the department to determine the applicant’s competency to install, maintain, and repair heating and cooling systems, heating and cooling service, burner service, and hydronic systems; and

Have paid a fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

If an applicant has obtained, while exempt from licensure under 198B.674(2), (7), (8), (10), (13), or (14), work experience that the department determines to be equivalent to the requirements of subsection (1)(c) or (2)(c) of this section, that experience may be considered as equivalent to one (1) year of employment toward the licensure requirements for a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor or journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic, as applicable, not to exceed one (1) year.

The department shall issue an apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic’s certificate to any person who registers as an apprentice with the department.
(4) (a)

The department shall issue an apprentice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic’s certificate to any person who registers as an apprentice with the department.

The department shall establish by administrative regulation the minimum number of hours of experience required by apprentices and shall maintain an apprentice register to credit an apprentice for hours worked under the supervision of a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor and journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic. Experience gained under the supervision of a Kentucky licensed master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor while registered as an apprentice with the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, Department of Workforce Investment, in cooperation with the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training shall be accepted toward the two (2) year experience requirement for a journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic license.

The apprentice register shall include the name, address, Social Security number, employer, and dates of employment of the apprentice.

The apprentice shall notify the department in writing of any change in address or employer.

Apprentices and pre-apprentices shall not be required to pay a fee to obtain a certificate of registration or to renew a registration.

The satisfactory completion of one (1) academic year of a department-approved curriculum or one (1) year of professional training in heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work may be considered as equivalent to one (1) year of employment toward the licensure requirements for a journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic, not to exceed one (1) year.

The satisfactory completion of one (1) academic year of teaching experience in a department-approved or state-approved technical education program in heating, ventilation, and air conditioning shall be considered as equivalent to one (1) year of employment, as required by subsection (1)(c) or (2)(c) of this section. No more than one (1) year of approved teaching experience may be used in meeting the requirements of subsection (1)(c) or (2)(c) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 579, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 289, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 93, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 169, § 47, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 7, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 173, § 11, effective June 27, 2019.

198B.659.
Military training and experience satisfies requirements of KRS 198B.658(1) or (2).

If an applicant for a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license or journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic’s license presents the department with proof of training and experience equivalent to the training and experience requirements of KRS 198B.658(1) or (2), whichever is applicable, acquired while serving as a member of the United States Armed Forces, Reserves, or National Guard, and actively engaged in that occupation as part of his or her military duties for not less than two (2) years as annotated on the Department of Defense Form DD 214, the department shall accept that training and experience. The applicant shall meet the remaining applicable qualification requirements set forth in KRS 198B.658(1) or (2).

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 93, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 169, § 48, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.660.
Application — Examinations — Procedures.

Each application for licensure or certification shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee.

Examinations shall be given at least two (2) times during each calendar year at those times and places within the Commonwealth prescribed by the department. An applicant shall not take an examination until the examination fee is paid.

Notice of passing or failing an examination shall be provided to each applicant as soon as practicable.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 49, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 7, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

198B.662.
Qualifications for journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanic’s license. [Repealed.]

198B.664.
Renewal and restoration of license — Grace period — Inactive status — Reactivation.

Every license issued by the department may be renewed annually, on or before the last day of the licensee’s birth month, upon payment of a renewal fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department. Failure to renew shall cause the license to expire.

A sixty (60) day grace period shall be allowed after the expiration of the license, during which time the licensee may continue to practice and may apply to restore the license upon payment of the renewal fee plus a restoration fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department, and upon the provision of applicable proof of insurance required by KRS 198B.668.

A license that is not restored before the end of the sixty (60) day grace period shall immediately terminate. Upon termination of the license, the former licensee shall be ineligible to practice in the Commonwealth until he or she thereafter satisfies all applicable licensing requirements in accordance with this chapter.

After the sixty (60) day grace period, a former licensee with a terminated license may apply to have the license reinstated upon payment of the renewal fee plus a reinstatement fee established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department. An applicant for reinstatement shall not be required to submit to any examination as a condition of reinstatement if the reinstatement application is made within three (3) years from the date of termination.

Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, an applicant for renewal, restoration, or reinstatement shall satisfy all other applicable qualifications for licensure as required by this chapter and the administrative regulations promulgated hereunder.

Those persons licensed by the department and not engaged in the practice of heating, ventilating, and air conditioning in the Commonwealth may apply for and be granted inactive status by the department in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the department. A licensee granted inactive status shall not engage in the practice of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning. An inactive license shall not be a valid license. A licensee on inactive status may petition the department for restoration of a license to practice. The petitioner shall pay a reactivation fee, satisfy all other requirements as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department, and, if applicable, obtain the insurance as required by KRS 198B.668.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 386, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 93, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 169, § 50, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.666.
Reciprocity for licensees of other states.

Any person who has been issued a license in another state which has licensing, educational, and experience requirements substantially equal to or greater than those of this state and which grants equal licensing privileges to persons licensed in this state, may be issued an equivalent license in this state upon terms and conditions determined by the department.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 51, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.667.
Interim period for use of recently deceased owner’s or employee’s master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license.

The department shall grant an interim period of up to one hundred eighty (180) continuous calendar days to allow a company to utilize the master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license of a recently deceased owner or deceased employee who procured heating, ventilation, and air conditioning permits for that company, provided that the company:

Effectuates and documents all necessary bonding and insurance policies required in this chapter; and

Ensures that the bonding and insurance policies remain in effect for the entirety of the interim time period extended by the department.

The license of a deceased master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor shall be terminated by the department at the end of the interim period.

Upon termination of the deceased master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license, a company shall have an employee with a current and valid Kentucky master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor’s license in order to procure permits and perform heating, ventilation, and air conditioning work governed by KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 22, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

198B.6671.
Permit required for installation of initial system — Contents of application and permit — Exemptions.

Notwithstanding KRS 198B.030 to the contrary, any person who installs an initial heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system shall apply for a permit prior to beginning the installation. No installation shall begin before the application for the permit has been filed. In no event, however, shall a person exempt under KRS 198B.674 be required to possess or show proof of a heating, ventilation, or air conditioning license in order to obtain the permit required by this section.

The applicant for a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning permit, by the act of applying for the permit, shall be deemed to consent to inspection of the installation by authorized inspectors of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and of the relevant city, county, urban-county government, charter county, unified local government, or consolidated local government.

The permit shall contain and display:

The name of the person performing the work;

The full extent of the work to be performed;

The name of the owner or owners of the property where the work is to be performed;

The location of the property where the work is to be performed, including county and street address; and

The master license number, if the work is required to be performed by a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor.

No permit shall be required for any installation performed on a manufactured home as defined in KRS 227.550, by a manufactured home retailer licensed pursuant to KRS 227.610, or by a manufacturer as defined in KRS 227.550.

No permit or inspection shall be required for the installation of window unit air conditioners or space heaters.

No permit or inspection shall be required for the installation of a heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system, except in buildings designed for human occupancy.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2008; 2017 ch. 169, § 52, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.6672.
Prohibition on use of system not installed in compliance with applicable codes — Inspection scheduling.

No person, firm, or corporation shall use, continue to use, or permit the use of any heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system that an authorized inspector or the inspector’s employee or agent determines was not installed in accordance with the Uniform State Building Code, the Uniform State Residential Code, and the referenced standards contained in the respective codes.

If a permit is required by KRS 198B.6671 for the installation of a heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system, no firm, person, or corporation shall use, continue to use, or permit the use of the heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system unless the permit has been obtained or applied for.

Any inspection required by KRS 198B.6671 shall be scheduled with the property owner or owners or their agent or agents at least one (1) business day in advance and shall be completed within three (3) business days of the scheduled inspection.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 2, effective January 1, 2009.

198B.6673.
Administrative regulations — Fees — Qualifications for and compensation of local government’s inspectors — Local governments prohibited from establishing additional permitting or inspection programs.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish a reasonable schedule of fees to implement the program. The fees shall not exceed the actual costs for the administration of the program. The department shall also establish heating, ventilation, and air conditioning inspection protocols that ensure timely inspections and minimal interruption to the construction process.

The department, upon the request of any individual local governing entity or combination of entities with existing heating, ventilation, and air conditioning permitting and inspection programs as of January 1, 2007, shall authorize them to administer, carry out, and enforce the administrative regulations of the department relating to heating, ventilation, and air conditioning installations, issue permits, and make inspections within their respective boundaries, or perform any portion of these functions. Nothing in KRS 198B.6671 to 198B.6678 shall prohibit these entities from continuing to include major repairs or substantial alterations to a heating, ventilation, or air conditioning system within their permitting and inspection program in the absence of a state requirement, if major repairs or substantial alterations were included in the entities’ inspection program prior to January 1, 2007. The department may authorize any other individual local government entities or combination of entities to administer, carry out, and enforce the administrative regulations of the department relating to heating, ventilation, and air conditioning installations, issue permits, and make inspections within their respective boundaries, or perform any portion of those functions. When authorization is granted, the department shall enter into contractual arrangements with the local governing entities, which shall remain in effect as long as the local entity continues to operate its program pursuant to guidelines adopted by the department. A heating, ventilation, and air conditioning permit issued by an authorized local governing entity shall be considered a permit issued by the department, and all fees collected by the authorized local government related to the same shall be retained by that local government.

Any local governing entity enforcing the permitting and inspection requirements of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may appoint and fix the compensation of the local governing entity’s heating, ventilation, and air conditioning inspectors. No person shall perform the duties of a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning inspector unless he or she has at least six (6) years’ experience as a licensed heating, ventilation, and air conditioning journeyman mechanic or a licensed master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor, unless he or she is a certified building inspector who has successfully passed the examinations relating to heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems. At the time of employment, the heating, ventilation, and air conditioning inspector shall be licensed or certified in accordance with KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, or become certified within twelve (12) months of employment.

No local governing entity shall impose any other additional heating, ventilation, and air conditioning inspection or permit requirements, or establish any local inspection or permitting program, unless those provisions were in place before January 1, 2007.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 3, effective July 1, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 290, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 53, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 7, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

198B.6674.
Trust and agency account to be used for enforcement of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689.

All fees and fines collected and paid into the State Treasury shall be credited to a revolving trust and agency account and shall be used only for the administration and enforcement of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 and the repayment of moneys borrowed from surplus trust and agency accounts of the department. The moneys in the account are hereby appropriated by the General Assembly for the purposes set forth in KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, and shall not lapse at the close of the fiscal year.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 4, effective July 1, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 291, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.6675.
Powers of department and of authorized local governments to inspect systems — Powers to restrain and enjoin violations of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 — Representation of department by state and local prosecutors.

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, officers, agents, and inspectors of the department or an authorized local government shall have the power and authority to enter upon permitted premises at all reasonable times with the consent of the property owner in order to make inspections, interview all persons, and request proof of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning licenses, installation permits, and other evidence of compliance. Officers, agents, and inspectors of the department or an authorized local government shall have the authority to issue a stop-work order to any owner, agent, or occupant of real property whenever the heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system under inspection is found to be in violation of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 or the Uniform State Building Code’s heating, ventilation, and air conditioning mechanical sections.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other civil or criminal penalties, the department and its officers, agents, and inspectors are authorized to institute and maintain actions to restrain and enjoin any violation of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, the Uniform State Building Code, the Uniform State Residential Code, or the rules or the administrative regulations of the department relating thereto.

City and county attorneys, Commonwealth’s attorneys, and the Attorney General may, within their respective jurisdictions, represent the department and its officers, agents, and inspectors in the enforcement of provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, the Uniform State Residential Code, and the Uniform State Building Code.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 5, effective January 1, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 292, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.6676.
Jurisdiction and venue in civil, injunctive, and criminal actions for enforcement of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689.

The Circuit Court where a violation occurs shall have jurisdiction and venue in all civil and injunctive actions instituted by the department for the enforcement of the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 and orders issued thereunder.

The District Court where a violation occurs shall have jurisdiction and venue in all criminal actions for the enforcement of the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, the Uniform State Building Code, the Uniform State Residential Code, and orders issued thereunder.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 6, effective July 1, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 293, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.6677.
Power of inspector to refuse to approve work covered by permit — Power of department or authorized local government to prohibit continued use of system — Aggrieved applicant’s right to hearing.

If an installation for which a permit is required does not meet the requirements of the Uniform State Building Code or the Uniform State Residential Code, whichever is applicable, or if the property owner refuses to allow an inspection, the inspector shall refuse to approve the work covered by the permit. The department or authorized local government may prohibit the continued use of a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system that an authorized inspector determines was improperly installed or altered if continued use threatens human life or if the property owner refused to allow an inspection.

An applicant aggrieved by an action of an inspector or the department may request a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 7, effective January 1, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 294, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.6678.
Department to appoint and assign qualified inspectors to counties.

The department shall appoint and assign heating, ventilation, and air conditioning inspectors to each county subject to the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 and in numbers sufficient to implement the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689.

No person shall be appointed as a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning inspector unless he or she has at least six (6) years’ experience as a licensed heating ventilation, and air conditioning journeyman mechanic or a licensed master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor, unless he or she is a certified building inspector who has successfully passed the examinations relating to heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems. At the time of his or her appointment, the inspector shall be licensed or certified in accordance with the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689, or become certified within twelve (12) months of employment.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 86, § 8, effective July 1, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 295, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 7, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

198B.668.
Insurance requirements.

No person, firm, or corporation shall practice heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting unless that person, firm, or corporation maintains general liability insurance in an amount not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) and property damage insurance in an amount not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) underwritten by an insurance carrier licensed and approved by the Kentucky Department of Insurance.

Proof of insurance shall be submitted to the department prior to issuance or renewal of a license.

Proof of insurance, as required by subsection (1) of this section, shall exempt licensees from the requirement of obtaining separate insurance in local jurisdictions under any local licensing laws.

No license shall be valid without the insurance required by this section. Insurance carriers shall notify the department upon cancellation of the insurance of any licensee required to maintain insurance.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 24, § 296, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 54, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.670.
Advertising or claiming to be a master contractor.

No person shall advertise as or claim to be a master heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor, unless that person is licensed by the department according to KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689. The license number shall appear in all advertising and on all vehicles used by the licensee for heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contracting work.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 169, § 55, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.672.
Sanctions — Reasons for sanctions.

Subject to a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the department may revoke, suspend, place on probation, or restrict the license or certificate of any licensee or certificate holder; refuse to issue or renew a license or certificate; or reprimand, censure, or fine a licensee or certificate holder for any of the following reasons:

Fraud or deceit in obtaining licensure or certification;

Transfer of the authority granted by the license or certificate to another person;

Unfair or deceptive trade practices;

Willful or deliberate disregard and violation of building codes, electrical codes, or related laws and ordinances of this Commonwealth or any city, county, or urban-county government;

Aiding or abetting any person attempting to evade the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689;

Conspiracy or knowingly combining with any person, to allow a license or certificate to be used by an unlicensed or uncertified person, firm, or corporation with intent to evade the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689. Allowing a license or certificate to be used by more than one (1) person shall be prima facie evidence of intent to evade the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689;

Willful or deliberate disregard of disciplinary actions taken by the department, or of a city, county, or urban-county government;

Negligence or incompetence in compliance with applicable codes and standards of practice;

Violation of any of the provisions of KRS 198B.650 to 198B.689 or any administrative regulation promulgated by the department; or

Conviction of a crime as defined in KRS 335B.010, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 59, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 88, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 158, § 36, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 169, § 56, effective June 29, 2017.